North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 19. Registration of Mortgage Bankers and Brokers. [Repealed]

§§ 53-233 through 53-243.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1017, s. 1.

Cross References.

For present provisions pertaining to the subject matter of the repealed article, see Article 19B (G.S. 53-244.010 et seq).